Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.115

Officer promotion board—Meetings—Powers and duties.

The officer promotion board will meet from time to time as directed by the adjutant general. The board will select the best qualified officer for each promotion to be made in the organized militia, and will do any other act pertaining thereto directed by the adjutant general or allowed or directed by statute.

[ 1989 c 19 s 17; 1974 ex.s. c 34 s 3.]